Hawaii statutes.
§710-1062 False swearing. (1) A
person commits the offense of false swearing if the person makes, under oath
required or authorized by law, a false statement which the person does not
believe to be true.

(2) False swearing is a petty misdemeanor. [L 1972,
c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1993]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next